North Carolina, session 2025, HB972.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of fifteen million seven hundred sixty thousand dollars
($15,760,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to provide a directed grant to
Wayne County to be used as follows:
(1) Five million dollars ($5,000,000) for a capital project at Rosewood Middle
School.
(2) Two million dollars ($2,000,000) to update the athletic track at Dillard Middle
School.
(3) One million dollars ($1,000,000) for water and sewer upgrades for the Village
of Walnut Creek.
(4) Seven hundred fifty thousand dollars ($750,000) for "Saving Union Station"
revitalization project.
(5) Five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) for a training facility for the Wayne
County Sheriff's Office.
(6) One million dollars ($1,000,000) for Wayne County United Way.
(7) Two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) for Wayne County Alcohol
Anonymous.
(8) Two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) for the Tuscarora Council
Scouting Program.
(11) Five million dollars ($5,000,000) for the Mattamuskeet Lodge Restoration
Initiative.
(12) Ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for Pricetown Volunteer Fire Department.
SECTION 2. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Administrative
Office of the Courts the sum of one hundred sixty-two thousand three hundred fifty-one dollars
($162,351) in recurring funds for each year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium and three thousand
seven hundred fifty-two dollars ($3,752) in nonrecurring funds in the 2025-2026 fiscal year to
be used to hire one assistant district attorney for Prosecutorial District 9.
SECTION 3. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Administrative
Office of the Courts, Office of Indigent Defense Services, the sum of two million three hundred
forty-seven thousand seventy-one dollars ($2,347,071) in recurring funds for each year of the
2025-2027 fiscal biennium and ninety-six thousand seven hundred thirty dollars ($96,730) in
*H972-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to create a new Defender District 9 serving
Green County, Lenoir County, and Wayne County and to hire the following positions:
(1) One Chief Public Defender.
(2) Ten Assistant Public Defenders.
(3) Two Chief Investigators.
(4) One Social Worker.
(5) One Administrative Assistant II positions.
(6) Two legal assistant I positions.
SECTION 4. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
Page 2 House Bill 972-First Edition